Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 238 Charitable Gaming
238.550.
Standards for management and accounting of funds — Reports — Charitable gaming expenses.

All adjusted gross receipts from charitable gaming shall be handled only by chairpersons, officers, or employees of the licensed charitable organization.

Within two (2) business days after the completion of a charitable gaming event or session, all gross receipts and adjusted gross receipts shall be deposited into one checking account devoted exclusively to charitable gaming. This checking account shall be designated the “charitable gaming account,” and the licensed charitable organization shall maintain its account at a financial institution located in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. No other funds may be deposited or transferred into the charitable gaming account.

All payments for charitable gaming expenses, payments made for prizes purchased, and any charitable donations from charitable gaming receipts shall be made from the charitable gaming account and the payments or donations shall be made only by bona fide officers of the organization by checks having preprinted consecutive numbers and made payable to specific persons or organizations. No check drawn on the charitable gaming account may be made payable to “cash,” or “bearer,” except that a licensed charitable organization may withdraw start-up funds for a charitable gaming event or session from the charitable gaming account by check made payable to “cash” or “bearer,” if these start-up funds are redeposited into the charitable gaming account together with all adjusted gross receipts derived from the particular event or session. Checks shall be imprinted with the words “charitable gaming account” and shall contain the organization’s license number on the face of each check. Payments for charitable gaming expenses, prizes purchased, and charitable donations may be made by electronic funds transfer if the payments are made to specific persons or organizations. The department may by administrative regulation adopt alternative reporting requirements for charitable gaming of limited scope or duration, if these requirements are sufficient to ensure accountability for all moneys handled.

A licensed charitable organization shall expend net receipts exclusively for purposes consistent with the charitable, religious, educational, literary, civic, fraternal, or patriotic functions or objectives for which the licensed charitable organization received and maintains federal tax-exempt status, or consistent with its status as a common school, an institution of higher education, or a state college or university. No net receipts shall inure to the private benefit or financial gain of any individual.

Accurate records and books shall be maintained by each organization exempt from licensure under KRS 238.535(1) and each licensed charitable organization for a period of three (3) years. Department staff shall have access to these records at reasonable times. Licensed charitable organizations and exempt organizations shall maintain their charitable gaming records at their offices or places of business within the Commonwealth of Kentucky as identified in their license applications or applications for exempt status. An exempt organization shall submit a yearly financial report in accordance with KRS 238.535(2), and failure to file this report shall constitute grounds for revocation of the organization’s exempt status.

All licensed charitable organizations that have annual gross receipts of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or less and do not have a weekly bingo session shall report to the department annually at the time and on a form established in administrative regulations promulgated by the department.

All other licensed charitable organizations shall submit reports to the department at least quarterly at the time and on a form established in administrative regulations promulgated by the department.

Failure by a licensed charitable organization to file reports required under this chapter shall constitute grounds for revocation of the organization’s license or denial of the organization’s application to renew its license in accordance with KRS 238.560(3). Reports filed by a licensed charitable organization shall include but shall not be limited to the following information:

All gross receipts received from charitable gaming for the reporting period, classified by type of gaming activity;

The names and addresses of all persons who are winners of prizes having a fair market value of six hundred dollars ($600) or more;

All expenses paid and the names and addresses of all persons to whom expenses were paid;

All net receipts retained and the names and addresses of all charitable endeavors that received money from the net receipts; and

Any other information the department deems appropriate.

No licensed charitable organization shall incur charitable gaming expenses, except as provided in this chapter. No licensed charitable organization shall be permitted to expend amounts in excess of prevailing market rates for the following charitable gaming expenses:

Charitable gaming supplies and equipment;

Rent;

Utilities;

Insurance;

Advertising;

Janitorial services;

Bookkeeping and accounting services;

Security services;

Membership dues for its participation in any charitable gaming trade organization; and

Any other expenses the department may determine by administrative regulation to be legitimate.

No licensed charitable organization shall expend receipts from charitable gaming activities nor incur expenses to form, maintain, or operate as a labor organization.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 11, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 10, effective April 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 232, § 11, effective April 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 374, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 120, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 544, effective July 15, 2010.

238.555.
Charitable gaming facility license — Lease agreements for use of facility — Quarterly reports — Number of events that may be held — Display of license and charitable organization’s name.

No person or organization shall operate a charitable gaming facility unless the person or organization is licensed under the provisions of this chapter, except that facilities that are utilized by two (2) or fewer charitable organizations for the purpose of conducting charitable gaming, and facilities that only host charity fundraising events, shall be exempt from licensure.

The department shall charge a license fee not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). Specific license fees to be charged shall be:

Prescribed in a graduated scale promulgated by administrative regulation; and

Based on the number of sessions which the facility holds per week or other applicable factors or combination of factors.

Charitable gaming may be conducted in a charitable gaming facility only by a licensed charitable organization in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

In the application process, an applicant for a charitable gaming facility license shall submit the following information:

The address of the facility;

A description of the facility to include square footage of the gaming area, capacity levels, and available parking;

The names, addresses, dates of birth, and Social Security numbers of all individuals employed by or contracted with the applicant to manage the facility or provide other authorized services;

The name, address, date of birth, and Social Security number of any individual who has a ten percent (10%) or greater financial interest in the facility;

A copy of the lease agreement used by the applicant; and

Any other information the department deems appropriate.

No owner, officer, employee, or contractee of a licensed charitable gaming facility or an affiliate, or any member of the immediate family of any officer, employee, or contractee of a licensed charitable gaming facility or an affiliate shall, concerning a lessee:

Manage or otherwise be involved in the conduct of charitable gaming;

Provide bookkeeping or other accounting services related to the conduct of charitable gaming;

Handle any moneys generated in the conduct of charitable gaming;

Advise a licensed charitable organization on the expenditure of net receipts;

Provide transportation services in any manner to patrons of a charitable gaming activity;

Provide advertisement or marketing services in any manner to a licensed charitable organization;

Provide, coordinate, or solicit the services of personnel or volunteers in any manner;

Influence or require a licensed charitable organization to use a certain distributor or any particular gaming supplies; or

Donate or give any prize to be awarded in the conduct of charitable gaming.

A licensed charitable gaming facility shall execute a lease agreement with each licensed charitable organization that desires to conduct charitable gaming at the facility. The amount of rent, goods, and services charged shall be reasonable and shall be based on prevailing market values in the general locality for the goods and services to be provided. The amount charged to rent a charitable gaming facility, whether the facility is licensed or unlicensed, shall not be based in whole or in part on a percentage of gross receipts, net proceeds derived from the conduct of charitable gaming, or by reference to the number of people in attendance. A licensed charitable gaming facility shall file a copy of each signed lease agreement with the department.

The number of bingo sessions conducted at a charitable gaming facility shall be limited to the following:

No more than eighteen (18) sessions per week if the charitable gaming facility is located in one (1) of the following:

A city containing a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census;

An urban-county government;

A consolidated local government;

A charter county government; or

A county containing a city of the first class or a city containing a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census; or

No more than eight (8) sessions per week if the charitable gaming facility is located in a city other than those listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection, or in a county that does not contain a city that is listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

A licensed charitable gaming facility shall report at least quarterly to the department and shall provide any information concerning its operation that the department may require.

A charity fundraising event at which special limited charitable games are played may be conducted at a licensed charitable gaming facility, but no licensed charitable gaming facility shall be permitted to hold more than one (1) such event per week or more than seven (7) per year.

A licensed charitable gaming facility shall conspicuously display a sign bearing the name and the license number of the charitable organization that is conducting charitable gaming activities in the facility.

The license to operate the charitable gaming facility shall be prominently displayed on or in the premises where charitable gaming activity is being conducted, in a conspicuous location that is readily accessible to gaming patrons as well as employees of the department, law enforcement officials, and other interested officials.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 12, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 11, effective April 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 232, § 12, effective April 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 374, § 13, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 346, § 213, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 24, § 545, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 92, § 283, effective January 1, 2015; 2021 ch. 200, § 3, effective April 8, 2021.

238.560.
Investigation of complaints — Administrative actions against violators.

The department may investigate allegations of wrongdoing upon complaint or upon its own volition. The department by administrative regulation shall establish procedures for receiving and investigating complaints in an expeditious manner.

In carrying out its enforcement responsibilities, the department may:

Inspect and examine all premises in which or on which charitable gaming is conducted or charitable gaming supplies or equipment are manufactured or distributed;

Seize and remove from premises and impound charitable gaming supplies and equipment for the purposes of examination and inspection pursuant to an appropriate court order;

Demand access to, inspect, and audit books and records of licensees for the purpose of determining compliance with laws and administrative regulations relative to charitable gaming; and

Conduct in-depth audits and investigations, when warranted.

As used in this subsection, “willful” means that the conduct constituting the violation was committed with intent, not accidentally or inadvertently.

The department may take appropriate administrative action against any person licensed under this chapter for any violation of the provisions of this chapter or administrative regulations promulgated thereunder subject to the conditions established by this subsection.

The department may deny a license, suspend or revoke a license, issue a cease and desist order, place a license holder on probation, issue a letter of reprimand or letter of warning, and levy a fine. An administrative fine shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense. The department may deny the issuance of a license or a license renewal if the applicant or licensee has failed to pay a fine levied by the department. The department shall by administrative regulation classify types of offenses and the recommended administrative action. The type of action to be taken shall be based on the history of previous violations and the nature, severity, and frequency of the offense. Administrative action authorized in this section shall be in addition to any criminal penalties provided in this chapter or under other provisions of law.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the department shall review, within two (2) months of receipt, timely filed organization quarterly reports that include payment of the fee due as reflected on the organization quarterly report. If the department discovers reporting errors that are not willful, the department shall, prior to taking any other administrative action, issue a letter of warning to the licensee and allow the licensee thirty (30) days from the issuance of the letter to correct the identified violation. The purpose of this subparagraph is for the department to identify correctable reporting errors in a timely manner, and to notify the licensee of the errors prior to the due date of the next organization quarterly report so that the errors are corrected and are not repeated in subsequent organization quarterly reports.

A review conducted under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall not be considered an audit or final review and acceptance of an organization quarterly report and payment. The department shall have four (4) years from the date of filing to fully audit and review an organization quarterly report, and may pursue administrative actions against the licensee related to an organization quarterly report or the information reported on an organization quarterly report within the four (4) year period if violations or errors that are not willful are discovered. This subparagraph shall not be construed to require records that are not needed to audit or review an organization quarterly report to be kept longer than is required elsewhere in this chapter or in any related administrative regulations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, for a violation that is determined to be willful, the department may pursue the administrative actions authorized by this section at any time.

A letter of warning issued under this section shall:

Identify the violation;

Describe the corrective action necessary;

Identify the administrative actions that can be taken if the violation is not addressed; and

Provide that the person shall have thirty (30) days to correct the action leading to the violation.

The department may reinstate a license that has been revoked at any time after two (2) years from the date of revocation. A license may be reinstated only upon a finding that the violations for which the license was revoked have been corrected.

All departments, divisions, boards, agencies, officers, and institutions of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and all subdivisions thereof, in particular local law enforcement entities, shall cooperate with the department in carrying out its enforcement responsibilities.

The department shall report any activity or action which would constitute a criminal offense to the appropriate authorities in the county where the activity or action occurred and to the Attorney General.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 13, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 12, effective April 10, 1996; 2000, ch. 374, § 14, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 120, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 546, effective July 15, 2010.

238.565.
Appeals of administrative actions.

A license holder may appeal any administrative action taken under KRS

238.560

. A license holder shall be notified in writing of any action to be taken against him. The notification may be delivered in person or mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the license holder. Service of notification of administrative action, whether by hand delivery or by certified mail, shall be deemed complete if the license holder fails or refuses to accept delivery. For service by hand delivery, notification shall be deemed received upon acceptance of delivery or upon failure or refusal to accept delivery, and the person affecting service on behalf of the department shall record the fact of the failure or refusal. For service by certified mail, the notification of administrative action shall be deemed received when the license holder accepts delivery or fails or refuses to accept delivery at the last known address. The notification shall specify the charges against the license holder, specify the proposed administrative sanction, and advise him of his right to appeal the decision within ten (10) days of the date of receipt of the notification.

Upon receipt of an appeal, the department shall schedule the matter for an administrative hearing that shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

Any provisions of KRS Chapter 13B notwithstanding, within twenty (20) days after the conclusion of a hearing, the hearing officer shall prepare and present to the commissioner a recommended order based on findings of fact and conclusions of law. Within thirty (30) days of receipt of the recommended order, the commissioner shall affirm, reject, or modify, in whole or in part, the recommended order and shall issue a final order. The final order shall be the final administrative action on the matter and a copy of the final order shall be mailed to the license holder, by certified mail, return receipt requested.

Any administrative action taken under this section shall, upon appeal, be stayed until a final order is issued, with the exception of a summary suspension. The department may issue an emergency order pursuant to KRS

13B.125

to summarily suspend a license upon finding that continued operation of the license holder pending a hearing would constitute a threat to the public health, safety, or welfare.

A final order of the commissioner may be appealed to Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. If the license holder against whom administrative action is proposed does not request an appeal of the action, the department shall enter a final order imposing the proposed administrative action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 14, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 158, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 374, § 15, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 547, effective July 15, 2010.

238.567.
Powers and duties of peace officers to deal with unlicensed charitable gaming.

All peace officers, on being informed or having reason to believe that charitable gaming not authorized under this chapter is taking place or is about to take place, shall suppress and prevent it. For this purpose, any peace officer may enter any place where any unlicensed charitable gaming is being conducted or about to be conducted and may arrest without a warrant any person who does not submit satisfactory proof that he or she possesses the necessary license required by this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 232, § 13, effective April 1, 1998.

238.570.
Charitable gaming fee — Charitable gaming regulatory account.

A fee is imposed on charitable gaming in the amount of fifty-three hundredths of one percent (0.53%) of gross receipts derived from all charitable gaming conducted by charitable organizations required to be licensed in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The amount of the fee shall be adjusted by October 1 of each odd-numbered year in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. Each licensed charitable organization shall remit to the department all moneys due as set forth in administrative regulations promulgated by the department. Failure by a licensed charitable organization to timely remit the fee required under this subsection upon notice of delinquency shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action in accordance with KRS

238.560

.

The charitable gaming regulatory account is hereby created as a revolving account within the agency revenue fund and under the control of the Public Protection Cabinet. All revenues generated from the fee levied in subsection (1) of this section from license fees and from administrative fines imposed by the department shall be deposited in this account. Fund amounts attributable to the fee levied in subsection (1) of this section that are not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

No later than July 31 of each odd-numbered year, the Public Protection Cabinet shall determine:

The amount of gross receipts during the prior biennium against which the fee collected under subsection (1) of this section was assessed; and

The final budgeted amount as determined by the enacted budget for the upcoming biennium for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter. If a budget is not enacted, the amount shall be the corresponding amount in the last enacted budget.

On October 1 of each odd-numbered year, the fee assessed under subsection (1) of this section shall be proportionally adjusted by the Public Protection Cabinet. The new rate shall be calculated by multiplying one hundred ten percent (110%) by the amount determined in paragraph (a)2. of this subsection, and subtracting from that amount one-half (1/2) of any remaining balance in the account. The total shall then be divided by the amount determined in paragraph (a)1. of this subsection. The result shall be expressed as a percentage and shall be rounded to the nearest thousandth of a percent (0.000%).

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 15, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 13, effective April 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 232, § 14, effective April 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 374, § 16, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 157, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 120, § 3, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 548, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts ch. 157, § 2, states that the amendment to the amount of the fee in subsection (1) of this statute made in 2005 Ky. Acts. ch. 157, § 1, is retroactive to July 1, 2004.

238.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]

238.995.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully conducts without the required license any activity which under this chapter requires a license shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who makes any materially false or misleading statement in making application for licensure or in submitting reports required under this chapter, or any person who willfully fails to maintain records or make entries required under this chapter, or any person who willfully refuses to produce for inspection any books, documents, or records required under this chapter shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who engages in conduct designed to corrupt the outcome of any charitable gaming activity with purpose to defraud or knowing that he is facilitating a fraud shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor unless:

The amount involved is five hundred dollars ($500) or more but less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor;

The amount involved is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more, in which case it is a Class D felony; or

The person has three (3) or more convictions under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph within the last five (5) years, in which case it is a Class D felony. The five (5) year period shall be measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of conviction were entered.

If any person commits two (2) or more separate offenses under paragraph (a) of this subsection within ninety (90) days, the offenses may be combined and treated as a single offense, and the value of the property in each offense may be aggregated for the purpose of determining the appropriate charge.

Any person who knowingly diverts charitable gaming funds from legitimate charitable purpose or lawful expenses allowed under this chapter to his financial benefit or the financial benefit of another person shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor unless:

The amount involved is five hundred dollars ($500) or more but less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor;

The amount involved is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more, in which case it is a Class D felony; or

The person has three (3) or more convictions under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph within the last five (5) years, in which case it is a Class D felony. The five (5) year period shall be measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of conviction were entered.

If any person commits two (2) or more separate offenses under paragraph (a) of this subsection within ninety (90) days, the offenses may be combined and treated as a single offense, and the value of the property in each offense may be aggregated for the purpose of determining the appropriate charge.

Any person who commits a second or subsequent offense within a five (5) year period under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit prosecution of a violation under KRS Chapter 528 by the Attorney General, county attorneys, or Commonwealth’s attorneys.

No person shall make or cause a false entry to be made in the business records of a charitable organization; alter, erase, obliterate, delete, remove, or destroy a true entry in the business records of a charitable organization; omit to make a true entry in the business records of a charitable organization in violation of a duty to do so that he or she knows to be imposed upon him or her by law or by the nature of his or her position; or prevent the making of a true entry or cause the omission thereof in the business records of a charitable organization.

Violation of subsection (7) of this section or falsifying business records of a charitable organization is a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 16, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 14, effective April 10, 1996; 2021 ch. 66, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.